Georgia, session 2025_26, HB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Troup County school district ad valorem
taxes for educational purposes in the amount of $10,000.00 of the assessed value of the
homestead for certain residents of that school district who have annual incomes not
exceeding $22,000.00 and who are 65 years of age or over, approved March 24, 1994
H. B. 103
- 1 -

LC 61 0016/AP
(Ga. L. 1994, p. 3844), as amended, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Section 2 as
follows:
"(a) Each resident of the Troup County school district who is 65 years of age or over is
granted an exemption on that person's homestead and not more than two contiguous acres
of homestead property from Troup County school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes in the amount of $100,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead, if that
person's annual income, together with the annual income of the spouse of such person who
resides within such homestead, does not exceed $50,000.00 for the immediately preceding
taxable year. Annual income shall include retirement benefits, disability, pension, and
Social Security benefits. The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount
shall remain subject to taxation. Any exemption granted under this Act shall cease on
December 31 of the taxable year in which the person claiming such exemption dies, sells,
or otherwise transfers the homestead."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Troup County shall call and conduct an election as provided
in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Troup County
school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that
election on Tuesday after the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and
conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the
date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately
H. B. 103
- 2 -

LC 61 0016/AP
preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Troup County. The ballot shall have
written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act which provides for a homestead exemption from Troup
County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes for
( ) NO residents who are 65 years of age or over be amended so as to increase the
exemption amount from $40,000.00 to $100,000.00 and the income cap
from $40,000.00 to $50,000.00?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th day following the election date provided for in this
section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Troup County. It shall be the
election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
section, any elector of the Troup County school district may apply for a writ of mandamus
to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
H. B. 103
- 3 -

LC 61 0016/AP
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 103
- 4 -